New Mexico, session 2026, HB206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 31-22-8 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1981, Chapter 325, Section 8, as amended) is amended to read: "31-22-8. CRIMES ENUMERATED.-- A. The crimes to which the Crime Victims Reparation Act applies and for which reparation to victims may be made are the following enumerated offenses and all other offenses in which any enumerated offense is necessarily included: (1) arson resulting in bodily injury; (2) assault, aggravated assault, battery or aggravated battery; (3) dangerous use of explosives resulting in bodily injury; (4) negligent use of a deadly weapon; (5) murder; (6) voluntary manslaughter; (7) involuntary manslaughter; (8) kidnapping; (9) criminal sexual penetration; (10) criminal sexual contact and criminal sexual contact of a minor; (11) failure to give information and render aid, as provided in Section 66-7-201 or 66-7-203 NMSA 1978; (12) homicide by vehicle or great bodily [injury] harm by vehicle, as provided in Section 66-8-101 NMSA 1978; (13) abandonment or abuse of a child; (14) aggravated indecent exposure, as provided in Section 30-9-14.3 NMSA 1978; (15) stalking; (16) human trafficking; (17) assault against a household member; [and] (18) battery against a household member; and (19) robbery while armed with a deadly weapon. B. No award shall be made for any loss or damage to property." - 3 -